Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.040

Rules—Prevention—Inspections and tests—Reportable disease—Federal regulations.

(1) The director may adopt and enforce rules necessary to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter, and including:

(a) Preventing the introduction or spreading of infectious, contagious, communicable, or dangerous diseases affecting animals in this state;

(b) Governing the inspection and testing of all animals within or about to be imported into this state;

(c) Designating any disease as a reportable disease; and

(d) Designating when a certificate of veterinary inspection, import health papers, permits, or other transportation documents required by law or rule must designate a destination with a physical address for animals entering Washington and when those animals must be delivered or transported directly to the physical address of that destination.

(2) Rules to prevent the introduction or spread of infectious, contagious, communicable, or dangerous diseases affecting animals in this state may differ from federal regulations by being more restrictive.

[ 2011 c 204 s 8; 1998 c 8 s 4; 1979 c 154 s 10; 1947 c 172 s 3; 1927 c 165 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3113. Prior: 1915 c 100 s 4; 1901 c 112 s 2; 1895 c 167 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 c 154: See note following RCW 15.49.330.